Illinois, session 104th, HB1159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and   HB1159- 2 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    specifically designed to provide information to one or 2    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 3    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 4        (c) Personal information contained within public 5    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 6    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 7    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 8    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 9    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 10    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 11    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 12    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 13    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 14    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 15    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 16    privacy. 17        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 18    created in the course of administrative enforcement 19    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 20    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 21    extent that disclosure would: 22            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 23        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 24        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 25        agency that is the recipient of the request; 26            (ii) interfere with active administrative   HB1159- 3 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 2        that is the recipient of the request; 3            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 4        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 5        hearing; 6            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 7        confidential source, confidential information 8        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 9        who file complaints with or provide information to 10        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 11        penal agencies; except that the identities of 12        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 13        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 14        local government, except when disclosure would 15        interfere with an active criminal investigation 16        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 17        request; 18            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 19        techniques other than those generally used and known 20        or disclose internal documents of correctional 21        agencies related to detection, observation, or 22        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 23        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 24        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 25        request; 26            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law   HB1159- 4 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 2            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 3        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 4        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 5    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 6    record management system if the law enforcement agency 7    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 8    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 9    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 10    access to the record through the shared electronic record 11    management system. 12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   HB1159- 5 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   HB1159- 6 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 11    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 12    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 13    claim. 14        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 15    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 16    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 17    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 18    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 19    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 20    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 21    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 22    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 23        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 24    information obtained from a person or business where the 25    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 26    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary,   HB1159- 7 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 2    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 3    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 4    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 5    requested.6        The information included under this exemption includes 7    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 8    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 9    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 10    company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 12    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 13    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 14    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 15    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 16    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 17    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 18    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 20    privately held company may cause competitive harm.21        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 22    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 23    to disclosure. 24        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 25    agreement, including information which if it were 26    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage   HB1159- 8 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 2    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 3    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 4    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 5    award or final selection is made. 6        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 7    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 8    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 9    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 10    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 11    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 12    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 13    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 14    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 15    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 16    legal rights of the general public. 17        (j) The following information pertaining to 18    educational matters:19            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 20        examination data used to administer an academic 21        examination; 22            (ii) information received by a primary or 23        secondary school, college, or university under its 24        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 25        their academic peers; 26            (iii) information concerning a school or   HB1159- 9 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 2        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 3        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and4            (iv) course materials or research materials used 5        by faculty members. 6        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 7    submissions, and other construction related technical 8    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 9    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 10    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 11    including, but not limited to, power generating and 12    distribution stations and other transmission and 13    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 14    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 15    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 16    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 17    security. 18        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 19    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 20    public body makes the minutes available to the public 21    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 22        (m) Communications between a public body and an 23    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 24    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 25    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 26    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative   HB1159- 10 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 2    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 3    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 4        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 5    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 6    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 7    cases in which discipline is imposed. 8        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 9    with automated data processing operations, including, but 10    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 11    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 12    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 13    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 14    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 15    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 16    security of the system or its data or the security of 17    materials exempt under this Section. 18        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 19    between public bodies and their employees or 20    representatives, except that any final contract or 21    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 22        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 23    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 24    an applicant for a license or employment. 25        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 26    to real estate purchase negotiations until those   HB1159- 11 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 2    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 3    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 4    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 5    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 6    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 7    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 8    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 9    until a sale is consummated. 10        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 11    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 12    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 13    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 14    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 15    intergovernmental risk management association or 16    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 17    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 18        (t) Information contained in or related to 19    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 20    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 21    for the regulation or supervision of financial 22    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 23    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 24    law. 25        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 26    the disclosure of secret or confidential information,   HB1159- 12 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 2    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 3    Electronic Transactions Act. 4        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 5    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 6    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 7    community's population or systems, facilities, or 8    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 9    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 10    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 11    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 12    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 13    include such things as details pertaining to the 14    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 15    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 16    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 17        (w) (Blank). 18        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 19    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 20    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 21    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 22    Illinois Power Agency. 23        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 24    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 25    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities   HB1159- 13 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 2    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission. 4        (z) Information about students exempted from 5    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 6    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 7    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 8    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 9    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 10        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 12        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 13    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 14    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 15    Mortality Review Team Act. 16        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 17    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 18    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 19    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.20        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 21    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 22    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 23    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 24        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 25    information of persons who are minors and are also 26    participants and registrants in programs of park   HB1159- 14 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 2    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 3    associations.4        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 5    information of participants and registrants in programs of 6    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 7    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 8    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 9    minors.10        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 11    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 12    2012. 13        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 14    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 15    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 16    School Code and any information contained in that report. 17        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 18    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 19    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 20    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 21    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 22    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 23    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 24    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 25    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 26    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of   HB1159- 15 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    Corrections.2        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 3    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 5    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 6    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 7    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 8    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 9    of a governmental entity or a person. 10        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 11    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 12    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 13    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 14    the procedure.15        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 17    Confidential Reporting Act. 18        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 19    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 20    Act. 21        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 22    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 24    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 25    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 26    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological   HB1159- 16 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 2    Act.3        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 4    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 5        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 6    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 7        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 8    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 9    protected health information, including demographic 10    information, that may be contained within or extracted 11    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 12    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 13    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 14    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 15    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 16    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 17    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 18    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 19    160.103. 20        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 21    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 22    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 23    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 24        (uu) Annual reports submitted by pharmacy benefit 25    managers under Section 513b1.5 of the Illinois Insurance 26    Code, except for the summary versions of the reports under   HB1159- 17 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 513b1.5 of the 2    Illinois Insurance Code. 3    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 4Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 5prior to disclosure under this Act. 6    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 7public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 8agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 9behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 10governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 11Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 12for purposes of this Act. 13    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 14information or limit the availability of records to the 15public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 16in this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 191-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 20eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 21103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 228-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 23eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 24    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 25changing Section 513b1 and by adding Section 513b1.5 as   HB1159- 18 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1follows: 2    (215 ILCS 5/513b1)3    Sec. 513b1. Pharmacy benefit manager contracts.4    (a) As used in this Section: 5    "340B drug discount program" means the program established 6under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 742 U.S.C. 256b. 8    "340B entity" means a covered entity as defined in 42 9U.S.C. 256b(a)(4) authorized to participate in the 340B drug 10discount program. 11    "340B pharmacy" means any pharmacy used to dispense 340B 12drugs for a covered entity, whether entity-owned or external. 13    "Biological product" has the meaning ascribed to that term 14in Section 19.5 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 15    "Covered individual" means a member, participant, 16enrollee, contract holder, policyholder, or beneficiary of a 17health benefit plan who is provided a prescription drug 18benefit by the health benefit plan.19    "Health benefit plan" means a policy, contract, 20certificate, or agreement entered into, offered, or issued by 21an insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or 22reimburse any of the costs of physical, mental, or behavioral 23health care services. "Health benefit plan" does not include 24Medicaid managed care organizations, as defined in Section 255-30.1 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, or employee welfare   HB1159- 19 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1benefit plans subject to the federal Employee Retirement 2Income Security Act of 1974. 3    "Maximum allowable cost" means the maximum amount that a 4pharmacy benefit manager will reimburse a pharmacy for the 5cost of a drug. 6    "Maximum allowable cost list" means a list of drugs for 7which a maximum allowable cost has been established by a 8pharmacy benefit manager. 9    "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person, business, or 10entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled 11subsidiary of a pharmacy benefit manager, that provides claims 12processing services or other prescription drug or device 13services, or both, for health benefit plans. 14    "Rebate aggregator" means a person or entity that 15negotiates rebates, discounts, or other fees attributable to 16usage by covered individuals with drug manufacturers on behalf 17of pharmacy benefit managers or their clients and may also be 18involved in contracts that entitle the rebate aggregator or 19its client to receive rebates, discounts, or other fees 20attributable to usage by covered individuals from drug 21manufacturers based on drug utilization or administration. 22    "Retail price" means the price an individual without 23prescription drug coverage would pay at a retail pharmacy, not 24including a pharmacist dispensing fee. 25    "Spread pricing" means the model of prescription drug 26pricing in which the pharmacy benefit manager charges a health   HB1159- 20 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1benefit plan a contracted price for prescription drugs and the 2contracted price for the prescription drugs differs from the 3amount the pharmacy benefit manager directly or indirectly 4pays the pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services.5    "Steer" includes, but is not limited to:6        (1) requiring a covered individual to use only a 7    pharmacy, including a mail-order pharmacy, in which the 8    pharmacy benefit manager maintains an ownership interest 9    or control;10        (2) offering or implementing a plan design that 11    encourages a covered individual to use a pharmacy in which 12    the pharmacy benefit manager maintains an ownership 13    interest or control, if such plan design increases costs 14    for the covered individual, including requiring a covered 15    individual to pay full costs for a prescription if the 16    covered individual chooses not to use a pharmacy owned or 17    controlled by the pharmacy benefit manager;18        (3) reimbursing a pharmacy or pharmacist for a 19    pharmaceutical product or pharmacist service in an amount 20    less than the amount that the pharmacy benefit manager 21    reimburses itself or an affiliate for providing the same 22    product or services, unless the pharmacy or pharmacist 23    contractually agrees to a lower reimbursement amount; or24        (4) any other actions determined by the Department by 25    rule. 26    "Third-party payer" means any entity that pays for   HB1159- 21 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1prescription drugs on behalf of a patient other than a health 2care provider or sponsor of a plan subject to regulation under 3Medicare Part D, 42 U.S.C. 1395w-101 et seq. 4    (b) A contract between a health insurer and a pharmacy 5benefit manager must require that the pharmacy benefit 6manager: 7        (1) Update maximum allowable cost pricing information 8    at least every 7 calendar days. 9        (2) Maintain a process that will, in a timely manner, 10    eliminate drugs from maximum allowable cost lists or 11    modify drug prices to remain consistent with changes in 12    pricing data used in formulating maximum allowable cost 13    prices and product availability. 14        (3) Provide access to its maximum allowable cost list 15    to each pharmacy or pharmacy services administrative 16    organization subject to the maximum allowable cost list. 17    Access may include a real-time pharmacy website portal to 18    be able to view the maximum allowable cost list. As used in 19    this Section, "pharmacy services administrative 20    organization" means an entity operating within the State 21    that contracts with independent pharmacies to conduct 22    business on their behalf with third-party payers. A 23    pharmacy services administrative organization may provide 24    administrative services to pharmacies and negotiate and 25    enter into contracts with third-party payers or pharmacy 26    benefit managers on behalf of pharmacies.   HB1159- 22 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        (4) Provide a process by which a contracted pharmacy 2    can appeal the provider's reimbursement for a drug subject 3    to maximum allowable cost pricing. The appeals process 4    must, at a minimum, include the following: 5            (A) A requirement that a contracted pharmacy has 6        14 calendar days after the applicable fill date to 7        appeal a maximum allowable cost if the reimbursement 8        for the drug is less than the net amount that the 9        network provider paid to the supplier of the drug. 10            (B) A requirement that a pharmacy benefit manager 11        must respond to a challenge within 14 calendar days of 12        the contracted pharmacy making the claim for which the 13        appeal has been submitted.14            (C) A telephone number and e-mail address or 15        website to network providers, at which the provider 16        can contact the pharmacy benefit manager to process 17        and submit an appeal.18            (D) A requirement that, if an appeal is denied, 19        the pharmacy benefit manager must provide the reason 20        for the denial and the name and the national drug code 21        number from national or regional wholesalers.22            (E) A requirement that, if an appeal is sustained, 23        the pharmacy benefit manager must make an adjustment 24        in the drug price effective the date the challenge is 25        resolved and make the adjustment applicable to all 26        similarly situated network pharmacy providers, as   HB1159- 23 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        determined by the managed care organization or 2        pharmacy benefit manager. 3        (5) Allow a plan sponsor whose coverage is 4    administered by the contracting with a pharmacy benefit 5    manager an annual right to audit compliance with the terms 6    of the contract by the pharmacy benefit manager, 7    including, but not limited to, full disclosure of any and 8    all rebate amounts secured, whether product specific or 9    generalized rebates, that were provided to the pharmacy 10    benefit manager by a pharmaceutical manufacturer.11        (6) Allow a plan sponsor whose coverage is 12    administered by the contracting with a pharmacy benefit 13    manager to request that the pharmacy benefit manager 14    disclose the actual amounts paid by the pharmacy benefit 15    manager to the pharmacy.16        (7) Provide notice to the plan sponsor and the party 17    contracting with the pharmacy benefit manager of any 18    consideration that the pharmacy benefit manager receives 19    from the manufacturer for dispense as written 20    prescriptions once a generic or biologically similar 21    product becomes available. 22    (c) In order to place a particular prescription drug on a 23maximum allowable cost list, the pharmacy benefit manager 24must, at a minimum, ensure that: 25        (1) if the drug is a generically equivalent drug, it 26    is listed as therapeutically equivalent and   HB1159- 24 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    pharmaceutically equivalent "A" or "B" rated in the United 2    States Food and Drug Administration's most recent version 3    of the "Orange Book" or have an NR or NA rating by 4    Medi-Span, Gold Standard, or a similar rating by a 5    nationally recognized reference; 6        (2) the drug is available for purchase by each 7    pharmacy in the State from national or regional 8    wholesalers operating in Illinois; and 9        (3) the drug is not obsolete. 10    (d) A pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from limiting 11a pharmacist's ability to disclose whether the cost-sharing 12obligation exceeds the retail price for a covered prescription 13drug, and the availability of a more affordable alternative 14drug, if one is available in accordance with Section 42 of the 15Pharmacy Practice Act. 16    (e) A health benefit plan insurer or pharmacy benefit 17manager shall not require a covered individual an insured to 18make a payment for a prescription drug at the point of sale in 19an amount that exceeds the lesser of: 20        (1) the applicable cost-sharing amount; or21        (2) the retail price of the drug in the absence of 22    prescription drug coverage. 23    (f) Unless required by law, a contract between a pharmacy 24benefit manager or third-party payer and a 340B entity or 340B 25pharmacy shall not contain any provision that: 26        (1) distinguishes between drugs purchased through the   HB1159- 25 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    340B drug discount program and other drugs when 2    determining reimbursement or reimbursement methodologies, 3    or contains otherwise less favorable payment terms or 4    reimbursement methodologies for 340B entities or 340B 5    pharmacies when compared to similarly situated non-340B 6    entities; 7        (2) imposes any fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment 8    that is not similarly imposed on similarly situated 9    pharmacies that are not 340B entities or 340B pharmacies; 10        (3) imposes any fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment 11    that exceeds the fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment that 12    is not similarly imposed on similarly situated pharmacies 13    that are not 340B entities or 340B pharmacies; 14        (4) prevents or interferes with an individual's choice 15    to receive a covered prescription drug from a 340B entity 16    or 340B pharmacy through any legally permissible means, 17    except that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the 18    establishment of differing copayments or other 19    cost-sharing amounts within the health benefit plan for 20    covered individuals persons who acquire covered 21    prescription drugs from a nonpreferred or nonparticipating 22    provider; 23        (5) excludes a 340B entity or 340B pharmacy from a 24    pharmacy network on any basis that includes consideration 25    of whether the 340B entity or 340B pharmacy participates 26    in the 340B drug discount program;   HB1159- 26 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1        (6) prevents a 340B entity or 340B pharmacy from using 2    a drug purchased under the 340B drug discount program; or 3        (7) any other provision that discriminates against a 4    340B entity or 340B pharmacy by treating the 340B entity 5    or 340B pharmacy differently than non-340B entities or 6    non-340B pharmacies for any reason relating to the 7    entity's participation in the 340B drug discount program. 8    As used in this subsection, "pharmacy benefit manager" and 9"third-party payer" do not include pharmacy benefit managers 10and third-party payers acting on behalf of a Medicaid program 11or an employee welfare benefit plan subject to the federal 12Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. 13    (f-5) A pharmacy benefit manager or an affiliate acting on 14the pharmacy benefit manager's behalf is prohibited from 15conducting spread pricing in this State.16    (f-10) A pharmacy benefit manager or an affiliate acting 17on the pharmacy benefit manager's behalf shall not steer a 18covered individual.19    (f-15) A pharmacy benefit manager or an affiliate acting 20on the pharmacy benefit manager's behalf must remit 100% of 21rebates and fees to the health benefit plan sponsor, consumer, 22or employer. Records of rebates and fees remitted from the 23pharmacy benefit manager or its contracted party shall be 24retained for 7 years.25    (f-20) A pharmacy benefit manager may not reimburse a 26pharmacy or pharmacist for a prescription drug or pharmacy   HB1159- 27 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1service in an amount less than the national average drug 2acquisition cost for the prescription drug or pharmacy service 3at the time the drug is administered or dispensed, plus a 4professional dispensing fee of $10.49. However, if the 5national average drug acquisition cost is not available at the 6time a drug is administered or dispensed, a pharmacy benefit 7manager may not reimburse in an amount that is less than the 8wholesale acquisition cost of the drug, as defined in 42 9U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), plus a professional dispensing fee 10of $10.49.11    (f-25) A pharmacy benefit manager or an affiliate acting 12on the pharmacy benefit manager's behalf is prohibited from 13limiting a covered individual's access to prescription drugs 14from a pharmacy or pharmacist enrolled with the health benefit 15plan under the terms offered to all pharmacies in the plan 16coverage area by unreasonably designating the covered 17prescription drugs as a specialty drug.18    (f-30) The contract between the pharmacy benefit manager 19and the insurer or health benefit plan sponsor must allow and 20provide for the pharmacy benefit manager's compliance with an 21audit at least once per calendar year of the rebate and fee 22records remitted from a pharmacy benefit manager or its 23contracted party to a health benefit plan. Contracts with 24rebate aggregators or drug manufactures must be available for 25audit by health benefit plan sponsors or designated third 26parties at least once per plan year. Audits shall be performed   HB1159- 28 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1by an auditor selected by the health benefit plan sponsor. 2Rebate contracts with rebate aggregators or drug manufactures 3shall be available for audit by health benefit plan sponsors. 4     (g) A violation of this Section by a pharmacy benefit 5manager constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in 6the business of insurance under Section 424. 7     (h) A provision that violates subsection (f) in a 8contract between a pharmacy benefit manager or a third-party 9payer and a 340B entity that is entered into, amended, or 10renewed after July 1, 2022 shall be void and unenforceable. 11     (i)(1) A pharmacy benefit manager may not retaliate 12against a pharmacist or pharmacy for disclosing information in 13a court, in an administrative hearing, before a legislative 14commission or committee, or in any other proceeding, if the 15pharmacist or pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe that 16the disclosed information is evidence of a violation of a 17State or federal law, rule, or regulation.18    (2) A pharmacy benefit manager may not retaliate against a 19pharmacist or pharmacy for disclosing information to a 20government or law enforcement agency, if the pharmacist or 21pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe that the disclosed 22information is evidence of a violation of a State or federal 23law, rule, or regulation.24    (3) A pharmacist or pharmacy shall make commercially 25reasonable efforts to limit the disclosure of confidential and 26proprietary information.  HB1159- 29 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    (4) Retaliatory actions against a pharmacy or pharmacist 2include cancellation of, restriction of, or refusal to renew 3or offer a contract to a pharmacy solely because the pharmacy 4or pharmacist has:5        (A) made disclosures of information that the 6    pharmacist or pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe is 7    evidence of a violation of a State or federal law, rule, or 8    regulation;9        (B) filed complaints with the plan or pharmacy benefit 10    manager; or11        (C) filed complaints against the plan or pharmacy 12    benefit manager with the Department.13    (j) This Section applies to contracts entered into or 14renewed on or after July 1, 2022. 15    (k) This Section applies to any health benefit group or 16individual policy of accident and health insurance or managed 17care plan that provides coverage for prescription drugs and 18that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or after 19July 1, 2020. 20(Source: P.A. 102-778, eff. 7-1-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 21103-453, eff. 8-4-23.) 22    (215 ILCS 5/513b1.5 new)23    Sec. 513b1.5. Pharmacy benefit manager reporting 24requirements. 25    (a) A pharmacy benefit manager that provides services for   HB1159- 30 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1a health benefit plan must submit an annual report, by no later 2than September 1, to the health benefit plan sponsor and 3issuer and include the following:4        (1) information collected from drug manufacturers on 5    copayment assistance;6        (2) a list of drugs covered by the health benefit 7    plan, including details such as the brand name, generic 8    name, number of participants, number of prescription 9    claims, dosage units, dispensing channel used, wholesale 10    acquisition cost, net cost, and total out-of-pocket 11    spending by covered individual;12        (3) information on each therapeutic class of drugs;13        (4) the amount received by the health benefit plan in 14    rebates, fees, or discounts related to drug utilization or 15    spending;16        (5) total gross spending on prescription drugs;17        (6) total net spending on prescription drugs by the 18    health benefit plan;19        (7) any compensation paid to brokers, consultants, 20    advisors, or any other individual or firm for referrals, 21    consideration, or retention by the health benefit plan; 22    and23        (8) an explanation of benefit design parameters 24    encouraging or requiring covered individuals to use 25    affiliated pharmacies, the percentage of prescriptions 26    charged by these pharmacies, and a list of drugs dispensed   HB1159- 31 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    by affiliated pharmacies with their associated costs.2    (b) Annual reports submitted pursuant to subsection (a):3        (1) must be written in plain language to ensure ease 4    of reading and accessibility;5        (2) may only contain summary health information to 6    ensure plan, coverage, or covered individual information 7    remains private and confidential;8        (3) upon request by a covered individual, must be 9    available in summary format and provide aggregated 10    information to help covered individuals understand their 11    health benefit plan's prescription drug coverage; and12        (4) must be filed with the Department no later than 13    September 1 of each year via the System for Electronic 14    Rates & Forms Filing. The filing shall include the summary 15    version of the report described in paragraph (3) of this 16    subsection, which shall be marked for public access.17    (c) A pharmacy benefit manager may petition the Department 18for a filing submission extension. The Director may grant or 19deny the extension within 5 business days after receiving the 20petition.21    (d) Failure by a pharmacy benefit manager to submit an 22annual report to the Department may result in a fine levied by 23the Director not to exceed $1,000 per day. Funds derived from 24fines levied shall be deposited into the Insurance Producer 25Administration Fund. Fine information shall be posted on the 26Department's website.  HB1159- 32 -LRB104 06506 BAB 16542 b1    (e) A pharmacy benefit manager found in violation of 2subsection (a) or paragraph (4) of subsection (b) may request 3a hearing from the Director within 10 days after being found in 4violation.5    (f) Except for the summary versions, the annual reports 6submitted by pharmacy benefit managers are considered 7confidential and privileged for all purposes, including for 8purposes of the Freedom of Information Act, a response to a 9subpoena, or evidence in a civil action.10    (g) A copy of an adverse decision against a pharmacy 11benefit manager for failing to submit an annual report to the 12Department must be posted to the Department's website. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.